Alaska, session 34, HB9.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.03.260 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (e) If a local school district receives funding in addition to the state aid 06 received under AS 14.17, including funding through a grant or an appropriation, the 07 local school board shall allocate to the charter school an amount from the additional 08 funding that is proportional to the annual program budget the local school board 09 provides to the charter school under (a) of this section in relation to the state aid the 10 local school district received under AS 14.17. 11 * Sec. 2. AS 14.30 is amended by adding a new section to read: 12 Sec. 14.30.282. Provision of medically necessary services in a school 13 setting. (a) Each school district shall establish and implement written procedures to 14 allow a child with a disability who has a medical diagnosis and presents a prescription 01 from a qualified health care professional to access medically necessary services in a 02 school setting. 03 (b) In this section, 04 (1) "health care provider" has the meaning given in AS 08.02.130(j); 05 (2) "qualified health care professional" means a health care provider 06 who is licensed in this state or board certified. 07 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 08 read: 09 APPLICABILITY. AS 14.03.260(e), added by sec. 1 of this Act, applies to contracts 10 entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.